California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person shall be eligible for nomination for membership on an assessment appeals board if, at the time
 of the nomination, they are a current member of an assessment appeals board.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person shall also be eligible for nomination for membership on an assessment appeals board for the County of Los Angeles if the person has a minimum of five years’ professional experience in this state in a real estate field, including, but not limited to, business accounting and taxation, land use and urban planning, real estate development or investment analysis, and real estate banking or financing.

(d) Documentation of qualifying experience of appeals board members shall be filed with the clerk of the board.

(e) This section shall apply only to an assessment appeals board in a county with a population of
 200,000 or more.

(f) County population estimates conducted by the Department of Finance pursuant to Section 13073.5 of the Government Code shall be used in determining the population of a county for purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 418, Sec. 1.   (AB 1203)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1624.1.

(a) A person shall not be qualified to be a member of an assessment appeals board if the person has, within the three years immediately preceding their appointment to that board, been an employee of an assessor’s office.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the board of supervisors for the County of Los Angeles may reduce, by resolution, the restriction described in subdivision (a) to no less than one year.

(2) This subdivision shall remain operative only until January 1, 2028, and is inoperative as of that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 418, Sec. 2.   (AB 1203)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1624.2.

No member of an assessment appeals board shall knowingly participate in any assessment appeal proceeding wherein the member has an interest in either the subject matter of or a party to the proceeding of such nature that it could reasonably be expected to influence the impartiality of his judgment in the proceeding. Violation of this section shall be cause for removal under Section 1625 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

1624.4.

(a) The party affected by an equalization proceeding or his or her agent, or the assessor, may make and file with the clerk of the assessment appeals board in which the proceeding is pending a written statement objecting to the hearing of a matter before a member of the board, and setting forth the facts constituting the ground of the disqualification of the member. Copies of the written statement shall be served by the presenting party on each party in the proceeding and on the board member alleged in the statement to be disqualified.

(b) Within 10 days after the filing of the statement, or within 10 days after the service of the statement as provided in subdivision (a), whichever is later, the board member alleged therein to be disqualified may file with the clerk his or her consent in writing that the action or proceeding be tried before another member, or may file with the clerk his or her written answer admitting or denying any or all of the allegations contained in the statement and setting forth any additional fact or facts material or relevant to the question of his or her disqualification. The clerk shall transmit a copy of the member’s consent or answer to each party who shall have appeared in the proceeding. Every statement and every answer shall be verified by oath in the manner prescribed by Section 446 of the Code of Civil Procedure for the verification of pleadings. The statement of a party objecting to the member on the ground of the member’s disqualification, shall be presented at the earliest practicable opportunity, after discovery of the facts constituting the ground of the member’s disqualification, and in any event before the commencement of the hearing of any issue of fact in the proceeding before the member.

(c) No member of the board, who shall deny his or her own disqualification, shall hear or pass upon the question of the disqualification. The question of the member’s disqualification shall be heard and determined by some other member agreed upon by the parties who have appeared in the proceeding, or, in the event of their failing to agree, by a member assigned to act by the clerk. Within five days after the expiration of the time allowed by this section for the member to answer, the clerk shall assign a member, not disqualified, to hear and determine the matter of the disqualification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1625.

Any member of an assessment appeals board may be removed for cause by the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

1626.

The board of supervisors of any county which has created one or more assessment appeals boards may discontinue all of said boards effective on the first Monday in September, subject to any such board continuing to function until matters pending before it have been disposed of. If all of such boards have been discontinued, no new board or boards may be created to function prior to the next succeeding first Monday in September. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the board of supervisors of any such county may increase, or may decrease to not less than one, the number of such boards, effective from and after the next succeeding first Monday in September, provided that any board so discontinued shall continue to function until matters pending before it have been disposed of.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 636.)
-------------------------------------------

1626.1.

Notwithstanding Section 1623, the board of supervisors of any county which has one or more assessment appeals boards in existence pursuant to this article may by ordinance increase the number of such boards effective from and after the first Monday in October and such boards shall remain in existence until discontinued under the provisions of Section 1626, but in no event shall the term of office of any member of the board exceed three years. Each term of office shall expire in a different calendar year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 733.)
-------------------------------------------

1628.

The clerk of the board of supervisors shall be clerk of the assessment appeals boards and keep a record of their proceedings. He shall perform the same duties in connection with their proceedings as he is required by law to perform in connection with the proceedings of the county board of equalization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 147.)
-------------------------------------------

1630.

(a) Any real property owner the use of whose land is subject to an enforceable restriction placed upon it by a local agency may apply to the governing body of the local agency for a written statement declaring the present intention of the governing body to refrain from removing or modifying any such restriction in the predictable future.

(b) The written statement of intention may be granted or denied by the governing body at its discretion. A reasonable fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10) may be charged for each such statement.

(c) The written statement may be presented to the county board of equalization as evidence that a restriction on the use of the taxpayer’s land exists and that such restriction should be considered in assessing the value of the land.

(d) The written statement shall constitute a rebuttable presumption that the governing body does not intend to remove or modify the restriction in the predictable future.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 147.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.7. Assessment Hearing Officers [1636. - 1641.5.]

1636.

The county board of supervisors may appoint one or more assessment hearing officers or contract with the Office of Administrative Hearings for the services of an administrative law judge pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 27720) of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code to conduct hearings on any assessment protests filed under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1601) of this chapter and to make recommendations to the county board of equalization or assessment appeals board concerning the protests. Only persons meeting the qualifications prescribed by Section 1624 may be appointed as an assessment hearing officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 938, Sec. 86.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 98 of Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

1637.

(a) Hearings before an assessment hearing officer shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 1601) governing equalization proceedings by a county board of equalization or an assessment appeals board. The assessment hearing officer may conduct hearings on applications where all of the following apply:

(1) The applicant is the assessee and has filed an application under Section 1603.

(2) For counties in which the board of supervisors has not adopted the provisions of Section 1641.1, the total assessed value of the property under consideration, as shown on the current assessment roll, does not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000); or the property under consideration is a single-family dwelling, condominium or cooperative, or a multiple-family dwelling of four units or less regardless of value.

(3) The applicant has requested that the hearing be held before an assessment hearing officer.

(b) In addition to subdivision (a), the board of supervisors may, by resolution, require the assent of the assessor to hearings before an assessment hearing officer in all cases in which the total assessed value on the current roll of the property under consideration exceeds a sum set by the resolution. However, that requirement shall not apply in cases involving owner-occupied residential property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 164, Sec. 3.   Effective July 24, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1638.

The applicant may be represented in the hearing of the application and shall have the right to offer evidence. The assessor may be represented in the hearing by an attorney if the applicant is represented by an attorney and one or more members of his staff, and the assessor and members of his staff shall have the right to offer evidence. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Section 1609. The hearing and disposition of applications shall be conducted in an informal manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 678, Sec. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

1639.

The hearing officer shall conduct the hearing and shall prepare a summary report of the proceedings together with his recommendation on the assessment protest. The hearing officer shall transmit his report and recommendation to the clerk of the board of supervisors. The report and recommendation shall not constitute precedent for future proceedings initiated by the applicant or other applicants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 797.)
-------------------------------------------

1640.

The clerk shall transmit in writing at the conclusion of the hearing or by mail to the protesting party or his or her agent and shall transmit to the county board of equalization or assessment appeals board the hearing officer’s report and recommendation on the assessment protest. The protesting party shall be informed that the county board of equalization is bound by the recommendation of the assessment hearing officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 705, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1640.1.

(a) The clerk shall transmit in writing at the conclusion of the hearing or by mail to the protesting party or his or her agent and shall transmit to the county board of equalization or assessment appeals board, the hearing officer’s report and recommendation on the assessment protest. The protesting party shall be informed that the county board of equalization or the assessment appeals board is not bound by the recommendation of the assessment hearing officer and that he or she or the assessor is entitled to a full hearing before the county board or the assessment appeals board.

(b) The provision of this section shall supersede the provisions of Section 1640 in those counties in which the board of supervisors by resolution adopts the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 705, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1641.

Upon the recommendation of an assessment hearing officer the county board of equalization or assessment appeals board shall establish the assessed value for the property at the value recommended by the hearing officer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1081, Sec. 15.   Effective September 26, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

1641.1.

(a) Upon being notified of the recommendation of an assessment hearing officer, the protesting party or the assessor may request the county board of equalization or assessment appeals board to accept or reject the recommendation of the assessment hearing officer. The assessor may request the board to reject the recommendation of the assessment hearing officer. The county board of equalization or assessment appeals board shall, without further testimony, do either of the following:

(1) Accept the recommendation and change the assessed value in accordance with Section 1610.8.

(2) Reject the recommendation and set the application for reduction for hearing by the local board of equalization.

If a request is not filed with the county board of equalization or assessment appeals board, the protesting party or the assessor may, within 14 days after mailing of the hearing officer’s report and recommendation, make application for a hearing before the county board or the assessment appeals board, and the application shall be set for hearing by the county board or the assessment appeals board. The board may consider, but shall not be bound by, the recommendation of the assessment hearing officer.

(b) The provisions of this section shall supersede the provisions of Section 1641 in those counties in which the board of supervisors by resolution adopts the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1224, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

1641.2.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1604, if within 90 days of the expiration of the two-year period specified in Section 1604 within which a county board is required to hear evidence and make a final determination on an application for reduction in assessment, a taxpayer or his or her agent objects to an assessment appeals board member pursuant to Section 1624.4 or makes application for a hearing officer’s recommendation to be heard before the county board pursuant to Section 1641.1, the two-year period shall be extended by 90 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 958, Sec. 1.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1641.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board of supervisors of a county in which a hearing officer exercises jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1637 may, by a resolution enacted by a majority of the entire membership of that board, provide that the decision of a hearing officer on an assessment appeal application constitutes the final administrative decision of the county board of equalization or county assessment appeals board on that application without any further action by the county board of equalization or county assessment appeals board.

(b) In a county that adopts the resolution described in subdivision (a), that resolution supersedes Sections 1640 and 1641.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 264, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.9. Hearings Before Assessment Hearing Officers for Unitary Property Located in More Than One County [1642. - 1645.5.]

1642.

(a) An assessee of mining or mineral property located in more than one county and alleged to be unitary property, may, within the time specified in Sections 1603 and 1605, request a hearing before a panel comprising one assessment hearing officer from each county in which that unitary property is located by filing in each county concerned a multicounty application for reduction of assessment. The board of supervisors of each county in which the unitary property is located shall appoint one assessment hearing officer pursuant to Section 1636. In the event that the unitary property is located in an even number of counties, the assessment hearing officers shall designate one additional assessment hearing officer who shall be included in the panel. If the assessment hearing officers fail to designate the additional hearing officer within 60 days after the application is filed, the Office of Administrative Hearings shall designate the additional assessment hearing officer.

(b) Hearings before the panel of assessment hearing officers shall be conducted pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1601) governing equalization proceedings by county boards of equalization. All counties in which the unitary property is located shall be parties to the hearing. Hearings shall be held at the place or places as a majority of the panel shall designate.

(c) Section 1638 shall apply to the hearings by the panel.

(d) The presence of all members of the panel shall be necessary to constitute a quorum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1480, Sec. 1.   Applicable July 1, 1989, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1480.)
-------------------------------------------

1643.

(a) The panel of hearing officers shall conduct the hearing and receive evidence to determine (1) if the property concerned is unitary and (2) if it is unitary, the value of the unitary property as a whole and the portion thereof allocable to each county. The panel shall prepare a summary report of the proceedings, and make a recommendation concerning the total value of the entire unitary property and the apportionment of that value among the counties concerned. Any determination by a majority of the hearing officers shall constitute a determination by the panel.

(b) If the panel determines that the property concerned is not unitary, the application shall be referred back to each of the counties concerned to be treated as an application for reduction of assessment filed in each county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1480, Sec. 1.   Applicable July 1, 1989, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1480.)
-------------------------------------------

1644.

The report and recommendation of the panel of hearing officers shall be transmitted to the county clerk of each of the counties concerned. Each county clerk shall transmit a copy of the report and recommendation to the protesting party, the assessor, and to the board of equalization or the assessment appeals board of the county concerned within 14 days of the receipt thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1480, Sec. 1.   Applicable July 1, 1989, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1480.)
-------------------------------------------

1645.

(a) If, within 30 days following receipt of the report and recommendation of the panel of hearing officers by the county board of equalization or assessment appeals board of a concerned county, the assessor of that county or the assessee submits a written request to the board to reject the recommendation of the panel of hearing officers with respect to property located in that county, the board shall, without further testimony, do either of the following:

(1) Accept the recommendation of the panel and change the assessed values for that county in accordance with that recommendation.

(2) Reject the recommendation of the panel and set the request for hearing before the board as an application for reduction of assessment.

(b) In the event that neither the assessor nor the assessee makes a request in accordance with subdivision (a) within the prescribed 30-day period, the board shall, not later than 60 days following its receipt of the report and recommendation of the panel of hearing officers, without further testimony, take the action specified in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) In any hearing set by the board pursuant to this section, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the recommendation of the panel of hearing officers is correct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1480, Sec. 1.   Applicable July 1, 1989, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1480.)
-------------------------------------------

1645.5.

For purposes of this article, the term “unitary property” shall mean one or more parcels of real property that are contiguous and are operated as an economic unit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1480, Sec. 1.   Applicable July 1, 1989, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1480.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Duties of Auditor [1646. - 1651.]

1646.

As soon as the auditor receives the local roll from the assessor, he shall add up the valuations on it and enter on the roll the total valuation of each kind of property and the total valuation of all property; provided, however, that if the assessment roll is a machine-prepared roll the prescribed computations and entries may be made and entered upon a newly prepared roll.

(a) In counties of the first class, after the board of supervisors has acted under Section 2151, the auditor shall perform the duties specified in Section 2152; provided that if the assessment roll is a machine-prepared roll, the prescribed computations and entries may be made and entered upon a newly prepared roll without incorporating any of the adjustments authorized by the local board of equalization.

(b) In all other counties, after the board of supervisors has acted under Section 2151, the auditor shall perform the duties specified in Section 2152; provided that if the assessment roll is a machine-prepared roll, the prescribed computations and entries may be made and entered upon a newly prepared roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

1646.1.

Upon receiving a statement from the clerk prepared under Section 1614, the auditor shall forthwith correct the roll to reflect the changes made by the county board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 147.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.

Annually, on or before August 15th, the auditor shall prepare duplicate valuation statements, verified by his attached affidavit, from the local roll as corrected for changes made during July. Within 60 days after the close of the assessment year, he shall prepare new statements to reflect all corrections of the roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 710.)
-------------------------------------------

1648.

The valuation statements shall show such information as the board may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 1008.)
-------------------------------------------

1649.

As soon as the valuation statements are prepared, the auditor shall transmit one to the controller and one to the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1650.

Every auditor who fails to transmit the valuation statements as required forfeits one thousand dollars to the State, to be recovered in an action brought by the Attorney General in the name of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1651.

Immediately upon completion of his duties under Section 1646, the auditor shall transmit the unsecured roll to the tax collector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1126.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Equalization with Assistance of Appraisal Commission [1716. - 1721.]

1716.

Whenever the board of supervisors and the assessor of any county determine that, in order to maintain the equality of the assessment of property within the county, an appraisal of all or any class of property is required, the clerk of the board of supervisors and the assessor shall certify this determination to the State Board of Equalization. Thereupon, the assessor, the chairman of the board of supervisors, and the member of the State Board of Equalization from the district which includes the county constitute an appraisal commission to conduct the appraisal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1801.)
-------------------------------------------

1717.

The appraisal commission may employ any technical assistants it deems necessary to carry out the required appraisal. A person so employed is not an additional deputy or assistant of the assessor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 147.)
-------------------------------------------

1717.1.

The requirements of Sections 670, 671 and 673 shall apply to employees of an appraisal commission.

Upon being employed by an appraisal commission, the employee shall disclose, on a form provided by the State Board of Equalization, his financial interest in any corporation in accordance with Section 672.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 147.)
-------------------------------------------

1718.

All work done under this article is in furtherance of the power of the county board to equalize assessments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1719.

The expenses of this appraisal are a county charge, and the board of supervisors may make the necessary appropriations to meet these expenses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1720.

A contract shall not be made with any person by which the duty of conducting such an appraisal is delegated to any private interests.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

1721.

Save assessments by the assessor or valuations of individual parcels by the county board during its authorized sessions, taxable property shall not be appraised for taxation under authority of any county except under this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Multijurisdictional Assessment Appeals Boards [1750. - 1756.]



  ARTICLE 1. Findings and Declarations [1750. - 1750.]

1750.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Section 16 of Article XIII of the California Constitution provides that the county board of supervisors, or one or more assessment appeals boards created by the county board of supervisors, constitutes the county board of equalization for a county.

(b) However, two or more county boards of supervisors may, under Section 16, jointly create one or more assessment appeals boards to serve as the county board of equalization for each of the participating counties.

(c) Section 16 additionally requires the Legislature to provide for the procedure by which two or more county boards of
 supervisors may jointly create one or more assessment appeals boards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   (SB 447)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 1756.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [1751. - 1751.]

1751.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Multijurisdictional assessment appeals board” or “board” means a board established by two or more counties pursuant to this chapter meeting as an assessment appeals board on behalf of the participating counties.

(b) “Participating county” means a county that has entered into an agreement, by enactment of an ordinance pursuant to Section 1752.1, to create a multijurisdictional assessment appeals board for the purpose of equalizing the valuation of assessed property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   (SB 447)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 1756.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Establishment and Procedure [1752. - 1752.4.]

1752.

(a) The boards of supervisors of two or more counties may establish a multijurisdictional assessment appeals board pursuant to this chapter to equalize the valuation of taxable property within each participating county.

(b) A board of supervisors of a participating county, or any assessment appeals board created by a board of supervisors of a participating county, shall not constitute the county board of equalization during the period in which a multijurisdictional assessment appeals board exists pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   (SB 447)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.1.

A multijurisdictional assessment appeals board shall be established by enactment of an ordinance, which shall be operative for not less than four years, by each participating county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   (SB 447)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.2.

The participating counties may adopt a set of rules of notice and procedures for the multijurisdictional assessment appeals board, as may be required to facilitate their work and to ensure uniformity in the processing and decision of equalization petitions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 433, Sec. 6.   (SB 825)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.3.

Unless otherwise specified in this chapter, the multijurisdictional assessment appeals board shall operate in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 1601), Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1620), Article 1.7 (commencing with Section 1636), and Article 1.9 (commencing with Section 1642) of Chapter 1, as those provisions relate to the functions of assessment appeals boards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   (SB 447)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.4.

(a) Nothing in this chapter or in any other law shall be construed to prohibit a multijurisdictional assessment appeals board from conducting hearings remotely. Remotely conducted hearings include, but are not limited to, the use of video, audio, and telephonic means for remote appearances; the electronic exchange and authentication of documentary evidence; e-filing and e-service; the use of remote interpreting; and the use of remote reporting and electronic recording to make the official record of an action or proceeding.

(b) If a board conducts a hearing remotely, it shall ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter and any rules and procedures adopted by the county board of supervisors pursuant to Section 16 of Article XIII of the
 California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 264, Sec. 24.   (AB 107)   Effective September 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Organization [1753. - 1753.3.]

1753.

The multijurisdictional assessment appeals board shall include a minimum of three members, comprised of at least one appointed representative from each participating county. The board of supervisors of each participating county shall appoint one or more representatives to serve on the multijurisdictional assessment appeals board as either members or alternates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   (SB 447)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.1.

(a) A member of the multijurisdictional assessment appeals board shall serve for a term determined by the participating counties, subject to subdivision (b).

(b) The lengths of the terms of members of the multijurisdictional assessment appeals board shall be structured so that not more than two members’ terms expire concurrently.

(c) Members of the multijurisdictional assessment appeals board shall meet all eligibility requirements set forth in Section 1624 and all training requirements set forth in Sections 1624.01 and 1624.02, as those sections read on January 1, 2017.

(d) A participating county may remove its
 appointed representative for cause by enactment of a resolution, adopted by a majority vote of the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   (SB 447)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.2.

Members of the board of supervisors are ineligible to serve as members or alternates to the multijurisdictional assessment appeals board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   (SB 447)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.3.

Any legal action filed by the county assessor or an assessee challenging the board’s determination shall be filed in the superior court with jurisdiction where the property that is the subject of the appeal is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   (SB 447)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 1756.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Lead Clerk [1754. - 1754.]

1754.

(a) The county clerk of the county where the appeal originated shall be designated as the lead clerk for the purposes of scheduling a hearing on an appeal before the board and coordinating with the county clerks of each participating county, unless the participating counties appoint a single county clerk to serve as the lead clerk for the multijurisdictional assessment appeals board.

(b) If the participating counties appoint a single county clerk to serve as the lead clerk for the multijurisdictional assessment appeals board, the agreement between the participating counties shall provide for the allocation of costs and reimbursements associated with the activities of the board among the participating
 counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   (SB 447)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 1756.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Admission and Withdrawal [1755. - 1755.1.]

1755.

A county may be added as a participating county by enactment of a resolution by a majority of the current participating counties and subsequent enactment of an ordinance by the new participating county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   (SB 447)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 1756.)
-------------------------------------------

1755.1.

(a) A participating county may withdraw from the multijurisdictional assessment appeals board by enactment of an ordinance terminating its membership.

(b) A participating county seeking to withdraw from the multijurisdictional assessment appeals board shall, by resolution, provide two years’ advance notice to the participating counties prior to withdrawal to allow for the disposal of all matters scheduled or pending before the board. Any matters filed before the two-year notice period ends that have not been heard and decided on the effective date of the termination shall automatically be referred to and be heard for final determination by the local board of equalization or successor board in the county from which the appeal was
 filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   (SB 447)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 1756.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Repeal Date [1756. - 1756.]

1756.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   (SB 447)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 1.5, commencing with Section 1750.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Equalization by State Board of Equalization [1815. - 1841.]



  ARTICLE 1. Generally [1815. - 1817.]

1815.

When valuing property, the board shall follow the provisions set forth in Section 402.5.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 327, Sec. 146.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

1816.

When valuing property other than “state-assessed property” as defined in Section 108, the board shall be subject to the same valuation considerations and methods applicable to assessors as provided by this code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 327, Sec. 146.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

1817.

Commencing with the 1987–88 fiscal year and annually thereafter, the board shall determine the statewide and county-by-county ratio of assessed value to fair market value of locally assessed commercial and industrial real property in California. The board shall publish these ratios.

The board shall determine these ratios by sales-assessment ratio studies of commercial and industrial property which has been transferred, which may be supplemented by board appraisals and by review of the amount of new construction added to the assessment rolls each year. The board shall conduct ratio studies in accordance with statistical principles applicable to those studies.

For this purpose, the board and its duly authorized representatives shall have access to all records, public or otherwise, of any county assessor, and further, the board shall prescribe by rules the information which shall be necessary to be developed by the county assessors to enable the board to perform sales-assessment ratio studies and the format in which the data or information shall be transmitted by the county assessors to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1457, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Review of Assessment of Publicly Owned Property [1840. - 1841.]

1840.

If any county, city and county, or municipal corporation desires to secure a review, equalization, or adjustment of the assessment of its property by the board pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 11 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, it shall apply to the board for that review, equalization, or adjustment in writing on or before November 30. If the assessment objected to is one made outside the regular period for those assessments, the application for review shall be filed with the board within 60 days from the date the tax bill is mailed to the assessee.

Every application shall show the facts claimed to require action of the board, and a copy of the application shall be filed with the assessor whose assessment
 is questioned. Upon receipt of a timely application, the board shall afford the applicant notice and a hearing in accordance with any rules and regulations as the board may prescribe. The failure to file a timely application shall bar the applicant from relief under subdivision (g) of Section 11 of Article XIII or this section.
